Connecticut, session 2026, HB05555.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 54-240 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Address confidentiality program" or "program" means the
program established pursuant to this chapter;
(2) "Agency" has the same meaning as "public agency" or "agency", as
provided in section 1-200;
(3) "Application assistant" means a person authorized by the
Secretary of the State to assist applicants in the completion of
applications for program participation;
(4) "Authorized personnel" means an employee in the office of the
Secretary of the State who has been designated by the Secretary of the
State, or an employee of an agency who has been designated by the chief
executive officer of such agency, to process and have access to records
pertaining to a program participant, including, but not limited to, voter
registration applications, voting records and marriage records;
LCO 1 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5555
(5) "Certification card" means a card issued by the Secretary of the
State pursuant to section 54-240d;
(6) "Confidential address" means a program participant's address or
addresses as listed on such participant's application for program
participation that are not to be disclosed, including such participant's
residential address in this state and work and school addresses in this
state, if any;
(7) "Family violence" has the same meaning as provided in section
46b-38a;
(8) "Gender-affirming health care services" has the same meaning as
provided in section 52-571m;
[(8)] (9) "Injury or risk of injury to a child" means any act or conduct
that constitutes a violation of section 53-21;
[(9)] (10) "Kidnapping" means any act that constitutes a violation of
section 53a-92, 53a-92a, 53a-94 or 53a-94a;
[(10)] (11) "Law enforcement agency" means the office of the Attorney
General, the office of the Chief State's Attorney, the Division of State
Police within the Department of Emergency Services and Public
Protection or any municipal police department;
[(11)] (12) "Marriage records" means an application for a marriage
license, an issued marriage license, a license certificate or other
documents related thereto;
[(12)] (13) "Program address" means the post office box number and
fictitious street address assigned to a program participant by the
Secretary of the State;
[(13)] (14) "Program participant" or "participant" means any person
certified by the Secretary of the State to participate in the address
confidentiality program;
LCO 2 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5555
[(14)] (15) "Record" has the same meaning as "public records or files"
as provided in section 1-200;
(16) "Reproductive health care services" has the same meaning as
provided in section 52-571m;
[(15)] (17) "Sexual assault" means any act that constitutes a violation
of section 53a-70b of the general statutes, revision of 1958, revised to
January 1, 2019, or section 53a-70, 53a-70a, 53a-71, 53a-72a, 53a-72b or
53a-73a;
[(16)] (18) "Stalking" means any act that constitutes a violation of
section 53a-181c, 53a-181d or 53a-181e; and
[(17)] (19) "Trafficking in persons" means any act that constitutes a
violation of section 53a-192a.
Sec. 2. Subsection (a) of section 54-240a of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) There shall be an address confidentiality program established in
the office of the Secretary of the State to provide a substitute mailing
address for any person who wishes to keep such person's residential
address confidential because of safety concerns and:
(1) [has] Has been a victim of (A) family violence, (B) injury or risk of
injury to a child, (C) kidnapping, (D) sexual assault, (E) stalking, (F)
trafficking in persons, or (G) child abuse or neglect, where such abuse
or neglect was substantiated by the Department of Children and
Families and was the basis for the issuance of a restraining order under
section 46b-15 or civil protection order under section 46b-16a; [, or]
(2) [a termination of parental rights was granted] The safety concerns
relate to another person whose parental rights were terminated in a
proceeding pursuant to section 45a-717 or 46b-129; or
(3) Is a person engaged in the provision, facilitation or promotion of
LCO 3 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5555
reproductive health care services or gender-affirming health care
services.
Sec. 3. Section 54-240b of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) An adult person, a guardian or conservator of the person acting
on behalf of an adult person, or a parent or guardian acting on behalf of
a minor may apply to the Secretary of the State for participation in the
address confidentiality program and to have the Secretary of the State
designate a program address to serve as the address of the adult person
or of the minor. Each application for program participation, other than
the application of a person engaged in the provision, facilitation or
promotion of reproductive health care services or gender-affirming
health care services, shall be completed with the assistance of an
application assistant.
(b) The Secretary of the State shall make available a list of entities that
employ application assistants to assist applicants in applying for
participation in the address confidentiality program, provided no entity
shall be included on such list unless the entity has received sufficient
funds from federal or state sources as reimbursement for the reasonable
costs of implementing the provisions of this chapter.
Sec. 4. Section 54-240c of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
The Secretary of the State shall certify an applicant or the person on
whose behalf an application is made as a program participant if the
application is filed in the manner and on the application form prescribed
by the Secretary of the State and includes:
100 (1) A statement made under penalty of false statement, as provided
101 in section 53a-157b, that (A) the applicant or the person on whose behalf
102 the application is made [(A)] is a victim of (i) family violence, (ii) injury
103 or risk of injury to a minor, (iii) kidnapping, (iv) sexual assault, (v)
104 stalking, (vi) trafficking in persons, or (vii) child abuse or neglect, where
LCO 4 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5555
105 such abuse or neglect was substantiated by the Department of Children
106 and Families and was the basis for the issuance of a restraining order
107 under section 46b-15 or civil protection order under section 46b-16a, [or
108 (B) a termination of parental rights was granted] (B) the applicant or the
109 person on whose behalf the application is made has safety concerns that
110 relate to another person whose parental rights were terminated in a
111 proceeding pursuant to section 45a-717 or 46b-129, [and (C) the
112 applicant fears for the safety of the applicant, children living in the
113 applicant's home, person on whose behalf the application is made or
114 children living in the home of the person on whose behalf the
115 application is made] or (C) the applicant (i) is a person engaged in the
116 provision, facilitation or promotion of reproductive health care services
117 or gender-affirming health care services that are permitted under the
118 laws of this state, and (ii) is employed or volunteers for a reproductive
119 health care services entity or gender-affirming health care entity that has
120 been the target of threats, harassment or acts of violence within one year
121 preceding the date of the application;
122 (2) A statement made under penalty of false statement, as provided
123 in section 53a-157b, that (A) for an applicant described in subparagraph
124 (A) or (B) of subdivision (1) of this section, the applicant fears for the
125 safety of the applicant, any children living in the applicant's home, any
126 person on whose behalf the application is made or any children living
127 in the home of the person on whose behalf the application is made, or
128 (B) for an applicant described in subparagraph (C) of subdivision (1) of
129 this section, the applicant fears for the safety of the applicant or any
130 children living in the home of the applicant;
131 [(2)] (3) Documentation supporting the [statement] statements made
132 pursuant to [subdivision (1)] subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section;
133 [(3)] (4) A designation of the Secretary of the State as the agent of the
134 applicant or, if applicable, of the person on whose behalf the application
135 is made, for service of process and for receipt of first class mail;
136 [(4)] (5) The residential address in this state, the work and school
LCO 5 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5555
137 addresses in this state, if any, and the phone number or numbers, if
138 available, that are to remain confidential, but which may be used by the
139 Secretary of the State or authorized personnel to contact the applicant
140 or, if applicable, the person on whose behalf the application is made;
141 and
142 [(5)] (6) The application preparation date, the applicant's signature
143 and, if applicable, the signature of the application assistant who assisted
144 the applicant in completing the application.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 54-240
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 54-240a(a)
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 54-240b
Sec. 4 October 1, 2026 54-240c
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 2(a)(3), "gender-affirming care" was changed to "gender-
affirming health care" for consistency with the defined term.
GAE Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 6 of 6